District of Columbia statutes.
34-1257.03

Construction schedule.

(a)

Every franchise agreement shall specify the construction schedule that will apply to any required construction, upgrade, or rebuild of the cable system. The schedule of construction, upgrade, or rebuild shall ensure that no substantial differences in the time by which service shall be available in a neighborhood shall be because of the neighborhood’s relative median income, ethnicity, or racial composition.

(b)

Within 90 days or at a time specified in the franchise agreement, whichever is longer, after the approval of a franchise, a cable operator shall file the documents required to obtain all necessary federal and District licenses, permits, and authorizations required for the conduct of its business, and shall submit monthly reports to the Office on its progress in this respect until all documents are obtained.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 703
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
This section is referenced in § 34-1254.05.